North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 5. Cooperation Between Department and United States Department of Agriculture, and County Commissioners.

§ 106-24.
Collection and publication of information relating to agriculture; cooperation.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall collect, compile, systematize, tabulate, and publish statistical information relating to agriculture. The Department is authorized to use sample surveys to collect primary data relating to agriculture. The Department is authorized to cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture and the several boards of county commissioners of the State, to accomplish the purpose of this Part.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall biennially collect information on water use by persons who withdraw 10,000 gallons per day or more of water from the surface or groundwater sources of the State for activities directly related or incidental to the production of crops, fruits, vegetables, ornamental and flowering plants, dairy products, livestock, poultry, and other agricultural products. The information shall be collected by survey conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and in accordance with Title 7 United States Code Section 2276 (Confidential Information Protection and Statistical Efficiency Act). The Department shall develop the survey form in consultation with the Department of Environmental Quality. The Department shall report the results of the water use survey to the Environmental Review Commission no later than July 1 of each year in which the survey was collected and shall provide a copy of the report to the Department of Environmental Quality. The report shall include recommendations about modifications to the survey, including changes in the gallons per day threshold for water use data collection. The report shall provide agricultural water use data by county. If the county is located in more than one river basin, the report shall separate the county data to show agricultural water use by river basin within the county. If publication of county or watershed data would result in disclosure of an individual operation’s water use, the data will be combined with data from another county or watershed.

History.

1921, c. 201, s. 1; C.S., s. 4689(a); 1941, c. 343; 1975, c. 611, s. 1; 1979, c. 228, s. 1; 1997-261, s. 25; 2008-143, s. 2(a); 2013-265, s. 6; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 106-24.1.
Confidentiality of information collected and published.

All information published by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant to this Part shall be classified so as to prevent the identification of information received from individual farm operators. All information generated by any federal agency received pursuant to this Chapter that is confidential under federal law shall be held confidential by the Department and its employees, unless confidentiality is waived by the federal agency. All information collected by the Department from farm owners or animal owners, including, but not limited to, certificates of veterinary inspection, animal medical records, laboratory reports received or generated from samples submitted for analysis, or other records that may be used to identify a person or private business entity subject to regulation by the Department shall not be disclosed without the permission of the owner unless the State Veterinarian determines that disclosure is necessary to prevent the spread of an animal disease or to protect the public health, or the disclosure is necessary in the implementation of these animal health programs.

History.

1979, c. 228, s. 3; 1993, c. 5, s. 1; 1997-261, s. 26; 2002-179, s. 8; 2013-265, s. 7; 2015-263, s. 31; 2018-113, s. 2.

§§ 106-25 through 106-26.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 288, s. 2.

§ 106-26.3.
Declaration of policy supporting sound science in agriculture.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that it shall be the policy of this State to support and promote sound science in agriculture. For purposes of this section, “sound science in agriculture” means the use of science-based agricultural practices, technologies, or biological systems supported by research or otherwise demonstrated to lead to broad outcomes-based improvements, including such critical outcomes as increasing agricultural productivity and improving human health through access to safe, nutritious, affordable food and other agricultural products, including organically produced foods and products, while enhancing agricultural and surrounding environmental conditions through the stewardship of water, soil, air quality, biodiversity, and wildlife habitat. Further, the General Assembly finds and declares that it is in the interest of the people of this State to use sound science in agriculture to meet the needs of the present and to improve the ability of future generations to meet their own needs, while advancing progress toward environmental and economic goals and the well-being of agricultural producers and rural communities.

History.

2015-263, s. 3.

§§ 106-26.4 through 106-26.6.

Reserved for future codification purposes.